Maryland, session 2026, SB0051.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0051*

SENATE BILL 51
Article – Education
7–455.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “EXCLUSION AREA” MEANS A SUPERVISED AREA TO WHICH A
STUDENT WHO RECEIVES INSTRUCTION IN A SELF–CONTAINED SPECIAL EDUCATION
CLASSROOM IS TAKEN FOR A LIMITED PERIOD OF TIME TO REGAIN SELF–CONTROL.
(3) “SPECIAL EDUCATION” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 8–401 OF
THIS ARTICLE.
(4) “SPECIAL EDUCATION CLASSROOM” MEANS A CLASSROOM IN A
PUBLIC SCHOOL IN WHICH A MAJORITY OF THE REGULARLY ATTENDING STUDENTS
ARE PROVIDED SPECIAL EDUCATION INSTRUCTION, INCLUDING STUDENTS WHO ARE
CLASSIFIED PRIMARILY AS CERTIFICATE TRACK, ARE PRIMARILY NONVERBAL, AND
ARE PARTICIPATING IN LIFE SKILLS OR COMMUNITY–BASED PROGRAMMING.
(B) (1) BEGINNING IN THE 2026–2027 SCHOOL YEAR, EACH COUNTY
BOARD SHALL INSTALL AT LEAST ONE VIDEO RECORDING DEVICE IN EACH
SELF–CONTAINED SPECIAL EDUCATION CLASSROOM.
(2) A VIDEO RECORDING DEVICE UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL
RECORD:
(I) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, ALL AREAS OF THE SELF–CONTAINED SPECIAL EDUCATION
CLASSROOM, INCLUDING ALL EXCLUSION AREAS; AND
(II) DURING SCHOOL HOURS AND AT ANY TIME THE
SELF–CONTAINED SPECIAL EDUCATION CLASSROOM OR EXCLUSION AREA IS IN USE.
(3) A VIDEO RECORDING DEVICE UNDER THIS SECTION MAY NOT
RECORD INSIDE BATHROOM AREAS OR IN AREAS THAT STUDENTS USE TO CHANGE
CLOTHING.
(C) EACH COUNTY BOARD SHALL PROVIDE NOTICE OF THE USE OF A VIDEO
RECORDING DEVICE IN A SELF–CONTAINED SPECIAL EDUCATION CLASSROOM BY:
(1) POSTING A SIGN IN A CONSPICUOUS LOCATION OUTSIDE EACH

SENATE BILL 51 3
SELF–CONTAINED SPECIAL EDUCATION CLASSROOM WHERE A VIDEO RECORDING
DEVICE IS USED;
(2) PROVIDING A WRITTEN NOTICE TO THE PARENT OR LEGAL
GUARDIAN OF EACH STUDENT WHO RECEIVES INSTRUCTION IN A SELF–CONTAINED
SPECIAL EDUCATION CLASSROOM; AND
(3) PROVIDING WRITTEN NOTICE IN THE STUDENT HANDBOOK OF
THE USE OF VIDEO RECORDING DEVICES.
(D) (1) UNLESS A COUNTY BOARD RECEIVES A REQUEST TO VIEW OR
STORE A PARTICULAR VIDEO RECORDING, THE COUNTY BOARD MAY NOT STORE A
VIDEO RECORDING MADE UNDER THIS SECTION FOR MORE THAN 6 MONTHS AFTER
THE DATE OF THE RECORDING.
(2) IF A REQUEST IS MADE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE COUNTY BOARD SHALL STORE THE VIDEO RECORDING UNTIL THE
REASON FOR THE REQUEST IS RESOLVED.
(3) IF A VIDEO RECORDING IS TO BE USED AS EVIDENCE TO SUPPORT
OR REFUTE A COMPLAINT AGAINST A STUDENT, AN EMPLOYEE, OR A CONTRACTOR,
THE COUNTY BOARD SHALL RETAIN THE PORTION OF THE VIDEO RECORDING
RELATED TO THE COMPLAINT FOR AT LEAST 1 YEAR AFTER THE DATE THE
COMPLAINT IS MADE.
(E) (1) IF A PERSON DISCOVERS THAT THE OPERATION OF A VIDEO
RECORDING DEVICE HAS BEEN INTERRUPTED, THE PERSON SHALL SUBMIT A
WRITTEN REPORT TO THE PRINCIPAL OF THE SCHOOL THAT INCLUDES A
DESCRIPTION OF:
(I) HOW THE INTERRUPTION WAS DISCOVERED AND THE
LENGTH OF THE INTERRUPTION; AND
(II) THE REASON FOR THE INTERRUPTION, IF KNOWN.
(2) A PRINCIPAL SHALL MAINTAIN A REPORT SUBMITTED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION FOR 1 YEAR AFTER THE DATE OF THE
SUBMISSION OF THE REPORT.
(F) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A
VIDEO RECORDING MADE IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION IS CONFIDENTIAL
AND MAY NOT BE VIEWED, SHARED, OR DISSEMINATED IN ANY MANNER.

SENATE BILL 51
(2) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (G) OF THIS SECTION, THE
FOLLOWING PERSONS MAY VIEW A VIDEO RECORDING MADE UNDER THIS SECTION:
(I) A MEMBER OF THE SCHOOL ADMINISTRATION;
(II) A SCHOOL RESOURCE OFFICER;
(III) A REPRESENTATIVE FROM CHILD PROTECTIVE SERVICES;
AND
(IV) A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY.
(G) (1) ON COMPLAINT OR REPORT TO THE SCHOOL, COUNTY BOARD, OR
OTHER LEGAL AUTHORITY FROM AN EMPLOYEE, A CONTRACTED EMPLOYEE, A
PARENT, OR ANY OTHER INTERESTED PARTY REGARDING AN INCIDENT THAT
OCCURRED IN THE SELF–CONTAINED SPECIAL EDUCATION CLASSROOM WHILE THE
VIDEO DEVICE WAS RECORDING, THE SCHOOL ADMINISTRATION SHALL REVIEW THE
VIDEO RECORDING NOT MORE THAN 3 DAYS AFTER THE DATE THE COMPLAINT OR
REPORT WAS MADE.
(2) AFTER REVIEW OF THE VIDEO RECORDING, IF THE SCHOOL
ADMINISTRATION OR, IF APPLICABLE, A REPRESENTATIVE FROM CHILD
PROTECTIVE SERVICES BELIEVES THAT THE VIDEO RECORDING SHOWS POTENTIAL
CRIMINAL CONDUCT, THE VIDEO SHALL BE MADE AVAILABLE ONLY TO A LAW
ENFORCEMENT AGENCY FOR AN INVESTIGATION.
(3) AT THE CONCLUSION OF AN INVESTIGATION BY A LAW
ENFORCEMENT AGENCY UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, AND ON
REQUEST OF THE STUDENT OR PARENT OF THE STUDENT TO WHOM THE VIDEO
RECORDING DIRECTLY RELATES, THE SCHOOL ADMINISTRATION SHALL ALLOW THE
STUDENT OR PARENT TO INSPECT AND REVIEW THE VIDEO RECORDING.
(H) (1) IF A SCHOOL ADMINISTRATOR OR OTHER EMPLOYEE OF A SCHOOL
OBSERVES AN ACTION THAT COULD BE CONSIDERED THE ABUSE OR NEGLECT OF A
STUDENT IN A SELF–CONTAINED SPECIAL EDUCATION CLASSROOM OR EXCLUSION
AREA, THE SCHOOL ADMINISTRATOR OR EMPLOYEE SHALL REPORT THE ACTION IN
ACCORDANCE WITH ANY APPLICABLE CHILD ABUSE AND NEGLECT REPORTING
GUIDELINES.
(2) ON RECEIVING A REPORT UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, A PRINCIPAL SHALL NOTIFY A PARENT OR LEGAL GUARDIAN OF THE
STUDENT WHO IS THE SUBJECT OF THE REPORT WITHIN 24 HOURS AFTER
RECEIVING THE REPORT.

SENATE BILL 51 5
(I) A COUNTY BOARD SHALL MAKE A REASONABLE ATTEMPT TO CONCEAL
THE IDENTITY OF ANY STUDENT WHO APPEARS IN A VIDEO RECORDING MADE UNDER
THIS SECTION WHO IS NOT INVOLVED IN THE INCIDENT FOR WHICH THE VIDEO
RECORDING IS BEING VIEWED.
(J) THE DEPARTMENT, A COUNTY BOARD, A SCHOOL, OR A PRINCIPAL MAY
NOT USE A VIDEO RECORDING DEVICE TO MONITOR THE PERFORMANCE OF SCHOOL
EMPLOYEES.
(K) A COUNTY BOARD MAY SOLICIT AND ACCEPT GIFTS, GRANTS, AND
DONATIONS FROM ANY PERSON TO BE USED TOWARD THE INSTALLATION AND
OPERATION OF A VIDEO RECORDING DEVICE UNDER THIS SECTION.
(L) ALL VIDEO RECORDING DEVICES UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL COMPLY
WITH FEDERAL FIRE AND SAFETY STANDARDS.
(M) (1) EACH YEAR, A COUNTY BOARD SHALL COLLECT DATA ON:
(I) THE NUMBER OF REQUESTS TO VIEW A VIDEO RECORDING
MADE UNDER THIS SECTION; AND
(II) THE IDENTITY OF THE PERSON THAT MADE A REQUEST.
(2) BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2027, AND EACH JANUARY 1
THEREAFTER, A COUNTY BOARD SHALL SUBMIT A REPORT TO THE DEPARTMENT ON
THE DATA COLLECTED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION FOR THE
IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING CALENDAR YEAR.
(N) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS NECESSARY TO CARRY
OUT THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SECTION.
8–401.
(a) (1) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(5) “Special education” means specially designed instruction, at no cost to
parents, to meet the unique needs of a child with a disability, including:
(i) Instruction in the classroom, in the home, in hospitals and
institutions, and in other settings; and
(ii) Instruction in physical education.

SENATE BILL 51
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.